en: Flavoured salivary stimulants
sv: Salivstimulanser med smak

en: Bodybuilding supplements
ca: Suplements per culturisme
de: Nahrungsergänzungen für Bodybuilder
es: Suplementos de culturismo
fi: Lisäravinteet kuntoiluun
fr: Compléments pour le Bodybuilding
he: תוספי מזון למפתחי גוף, תוספי מזון למתאמנים, תוספי תזונה לבאדליבילדרים
hr: Dodaci prehrani za bodybuilding
it: Integratori per bodybuilding
nl: Bodybuilding supplementen
ro: Suplimente pentru culturism
zh: 健身增肌补充品

en: Protein powders
da: Proteinpulvere
de: Proteinpulver, Eiweißpulver
es: Polvos de proteína
fi: proteiinijauheet
fr: Protéines en poudre
hr: Proteinski prahovi
it: Proteine in polvere, Polvere di proteine
ja: プロテインパウダー
nl: Proteinepoeders
pl: Odżywki białkowe

en: Protein shakes
bg: Протеинов шейк
de: Proteinshakes, Eiweißshakes, Protein Shakes
es: Batidos protéicos
fi: Proteiinipirtelöt
fr: Boisson protéinée
hr: Proteinski shakeovi
it: Frappè Proteico
ja: プロテインシェイク
nl: Proteineshakes
ro: Shake-uri cu proteine, Shake-uri proteice

en: BCAA, Branched-chain amino acids
de: verzweigtkettige Aminosäuren
fi: BCAA, Branched-chain amino acids, Haaroittuneet aminohapot
fr: Acides aminés ramifiés
hr: BCAA, Aminokiseline razgranatog lanca
nl: Vertakte keten aminozuren

en: Glutamine, L-Glutamine
ca: Glutamina, L-Glutamina
de: Glutamin, L-Glutamin, 2-Amino-4-carbamoylbutansäure, 2-Amino-4-carbamoylbuttersäure, Glutaminsäure-5-amid
es: Glutamina, L-Glutamina
fr: Glutamine
hr: Glutamin
ja: グルタミン
pl: Glutamina

en: MRPs, Meal replacement products
de: Mahlzeitersatz

en: Prohormones
de: Prohormone

en: Creatine, Creatine supplements, Creatine monohydrate
bg: Креатин
ca: Creatina, Monohidrat de creatina
da: Kreatin
de: Kreatin, N-Amidinosarkosin, N-(Aminoiminomethyl)-N-methyl-glycin, α-Methylguanidinoessigsäure
es: Creatina, Monohidrato de creatina
fi: Kreatiini, Kreatiinilisäravinteet
hr: Kreatin

en: Thermogenics, Thermogenic products
de: Thermogenese fördernde Lebensmittel
es: Termogénicos, Productos termogénicos
fr: Produits thermogéniques
hr: Termogenika

en: Chyawanprash
xx: Chyawanprash, Chyavanprash
sa: च्यवनप्राश

en: Sushki
es: Sushki
hr: Sushki
nl: Sushki
ru: Сушки, Баранки

en: Pryaniki
de: Prjaniki
es: Pryaniki
fr: Prianiki
hr: Pryaniki
nl: Pryaniki
pl: Pierniki
ru: Пряники

en: Tula gingerbread
de: Tula-Lebkuchen
es: Pan de jengibre de Tula
hr: Tulski medenjak
nl: Tula-ontbijtkoeken, Tula-ontbijtkoek
ru: Пряники тульские, Тульские пряники, Тульский пряник, Пряник тульский

en: Cooking helpers
ca: Ajudants de cuina
de: Kochhelfer
es: Ayudas culinarias, Otras ayudas culinarias
fi: kokkausavut
fr: Aides culinaires, Aides à la cuisine, Autres aides culinaires
he: מסייעי אפייה, תומכי אפייה, עוזרי אפייה, עזרי אפייה, חומרי אפייה
hr: Pomoćnici u kuhanju
nl: Kookhulpmiddelen, Voedselhulpmiddelen
ru: Кулинарные добавки
zh: 厨房神器

en: Shelf-stable cooking helpers
de: Lagerstabile Kochhelfer
es: Ayudas culinarias estables
fr: Aides culinaires conservables
hr: Pomoćnici kuhanja stabilni na policama
nl: Houdbare kookhulpmiddelen

en: Pastry helpers
de: Backhelfer
fi: Leivonta-avut
fr: Aides à la pâtisserie
hr: Slastičarski pomoćnici
nl: Banketbakkerhulpmiddelen
ru: Добавки для мучных изделий

en: Cocoa glazes
fr: Glaçages au cacao

en: Chocolate drops
fr: Pépites de chocolat

en: Milk chocolate drops
fr: Pépites de chocolat au lait